Utah statutes.
62A-4a-103.   Division -- Creation -- Purpose.

(1) (a)  There is created the Division of Child and Family Services within the department, under the administration and general supervision of the executive director.

(b)  The division is the child, youth, and family services authority of the state and has all functions, powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities created in accordance with this chapter, except those assumed by the department.

(2) (a)  The primary purpose of the division is to provide child welfare services.

(b)  The division shall, when possible and appropriate, provide preventive services and family preservation services in an effort to protect the child from the trauma of separation from his family, protect the integrity of the family, and the constitutional rights of parents.  In keeping with its ultimate goal and purpose of protecting children, however, when a child's welfare is endangered or reasonable efforts to maintain or reunify a child with his family have failed, the division shall act in a timely fashion in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings, to provide the child with a stable, permanent environment.

(3)  The division shall also provide domestic violence services in accordance with federal law.

